Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A city, county, charter county government, urban-county government, consolidated
local government, unified local government, or special district shall not adopt or
enforce an ordinance, regulation, or policy that creates or maintains a registry of
landlords or residential rental properties for any purpose, including:
(1) Assessments of the safety of a rental unit, including of lead hazard within a rental
unit; or
(2) Requiring a landlord to conduct an evaluation or prepare a report regarding lead
hazard of a rental property unit.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/9/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed